Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,131
Director; powers and duties.

The director shall have authority to exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of the Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Act. In carrying out such powers the director shall advise, consult, and cooperate with agencies of the state, the federal government, other states, interested groups, political subdivisions, and industries.

Laws 1987, LB 533, § 4.